Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB57.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 189.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Highways;
(2) "Crosswalk" means:
(a) That part of a roadway at an intersection within the connections of the lateral
lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured from the
curbs or in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the traversable roadway; or
(b) Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or elsewhere distinctly indicated
for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface;
(3) "Highway" means any public road, street, avenue, alley or boulevard, bridge,
viaduct, or trestle and the approaches to them and includes private residential roads
and parking lots covered by an agreement under KRS 61.362, off-street parking
facilities offered for public use, whether publicly or privately owned, except for-
hire parking facilities listed in KRS 189.700;
(4) "Intersection" means:
(a) The area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb
lines, or, if none, then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two (2)
highways which join one another, but do not necessarily continue, at
approximately right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon
different highways joining at any other angle may come into conflict; or
(b) Where a highway includes two (2) roadways thirty (30) feet or more apart,
then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by an
intersecting highway shall be regarded as a separate intersection. If the
intersecting highway also includes two (2) roadways thirty (30) feet or more
Page 1 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
apart, every crossing of two (2) roadways of the highways shall be regarded as
a separate intersection. The junction of a private alley with a public street or
highway shall not constitute an intersection;
(5) "Manufactured home" has the same meaning as defined in KRS 186.650;
(6) "Motor truck" means any motor-propelled vehicle designed for carrying freight or
merchandise. It shall not include self-propelled vehicles designed primarily for
passenger transportation but equipped with frames, racks, or bodies having a load
capacity of not exceeding one thousand (1,000) pounds;
(7) "Operator" means the person in actual physical control of a vehicle;
(8) "Pedestrian" means any person afoot or in a wheelchair;
(9) "Right-of-way" means the right of one (1) vehicle or pedestrian to proceed in a
lawful manner in preference to another vehicle or pedestrian approaching under
such circumstances of direction, speed, and proximity as to give rise to danger of
collision unless one grants precedence to the other;
(10) "Roadway" means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used
for vehicular travel, exclusive of the berm or shoulder. If a highway includes two
(2) or more separate roadways, the term "roadway" as used herein shall refer to any
roadway separately but not to all such roadways collectively;
(11) "Safety zone" means the area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the
exclusive use of pedestrians and which is protected or is so marked or indicated by
adequate signs as to be plainly visible at all times while set apart as a safety zone;
(12) "Semitrailer" means a vehicle designed to be attached to, and having its front end
supported by, a motor truck or truck tractor, intended for the carrying of freight or
merchandise and having a load capacity of over one thousand (1,000) pounds;
(13) "Truck tractor" means any motor-propelled vehicle designed to draw and to support
the front end of a semitrailer. The semitrailer and the truck tractor shall be
considered to be one (1) unit;
Page 2 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
(14) "Sharp curve" means a curve of not less than thirty (30) degrees;
(15) "State Police" includes any agency for the enforcement of the highway laws
established pursuant to law;
(16) "Steep grade" means a grade exceeding seven percent (7%);
(17) "Trailer" means any vehicle designed to be drawn by a motor truck or truck-tractor,
but supported wholly upon its own wheels, intended for the carriage of freight or
merchandise and having a load capacity of over one thousand (1,000) pounds;
(18) "Unobstructed highway" means a straight, level, first-class road upon which no
other vehicle is passing or attempting to pass and upon which no other vehicle or
pedestrian is approaching in the opposite direction, closer than three hundred (300)
yards;
(19) (a) "Vehicle" includes:
1. All agencies for the transportation of persons or property over or upon
the public highways of the Commonwealth; and
2. All vehicles passing over or upon the highways.
(b) "Motor vehicle" includes all vehicles, as defined in paragraph (a) of this
subsection, except:
1. Road rollers;
2. Road graders;
3. Farm tractors;
4. Vehicles on which power shovels are mounted;
5. Construction equipment customarily used only on the site of
construction and which is not practical for the transportation of persons
or property upon the highways;
6. Vehicles that travel exclusively upon rails;
7. Vehicles propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires
while being operated within any municipality or where the vehicles do
Page 3 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
not travel more than five (5) miles beyond the city limits of any
municipality;
8. Vehicles propelled by muscular power; and
9. Electric low-speed scooters;
(20) "Reflectance" means the ratio of the amount of total light, expressed in a
percentage, which is reflected outward by the product or material to the amount of
total light falling on the product or material;
(21) "Sunscreening material" means a product or material, including film, glazing, and
perforated sunscreening, which, when applied to the windshield or windows of a
motor vehicle, reduces the effects of the sun with respect to light reflectance or
transmittance;
(22) "Transmittance" means the ratio of the amount of total light, expressed in a
percentage, which is allowed to pass through the product or material, including
glazing, to the amount of total light falling on the product or material and the
glazing;
(23) "Window" means any device designed for exterior viewing from a motor vehicle,
except the windshield, any roof-mounted viewing device, and any viewing device
having less than one hundred fifty (150) square inches in area;
(24) "All-terrain vehicle" means any motor vehicle used for recreational off-road use;
(25) "Nondivisible load," as pertains to state highways that are not part of the national
truck network established pursuant to 23 C.F.R. pt. 658, means a load or vehicle,
that if separated into smaller loads or vehicles:
(a) Compromises the intended use of the vehicle, making it unable to perform the
function for which it was intended;
(b) Destroys the value of the load or vehicle, making it unusable for its intended
purpose; or
(c) Requires more than four (4) work hours to dismantle and reassemble using
Page 4 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
appropriate equipment;
(26) "Electric low-speed scooter" means a device that:
(a) Weighs less than one hundred (100) pounds;
(b) Is equipped with wheels;
(c) Is equipped with handlebars;
(d) Is equipped with a brake adequate enough to stop and park the device;
(e) Is designed to be stood or sat upon;
(f) Is propelled by an electric motor, human power, or both; and
(g) Is designed to operate at a maximum speed of twenty (20) miles per hour, on a
paved level surface, with or without human propulsion; and
(27) "Highway work zone" means that portion of a highway and the affected area
adjacent to a lane, berm, or shoulder, including a sidewalk, upon which
construction, reconstruction, resurfacing, maintenance, inspection, or other work of
that nature is being conducted by a government agency, private contractor, or utility
company; and
(28) "Super speeder" means any driver who has been convicted of violating KRS
189.390 by driving at a speed of:
(a) Twenty (20) miles per hour or greater in excess of the posted speed on any
highway that is part of the state primary road system identified in KRS
177.020 which has one (1) lane of travel in each direction; or
(b) Twenty-five (25) miles per hours or greater in excess of the posted speed on
any other highway that is part of the state primary road system identified in
KRS 177.020.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 189 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In addition to the fines assessed for speeding under Section 4 of this Act, the
cabinet shall assess a fee of two hundred dollars ($200) to any person convicted
Page 5 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
as a super speeder.
(2) (a) The cabinet shall, within thirty (30) days of receipt of a qualifying offense
and notice of conviction, notify offenders of the imposition of a fee under
this section.
(b) Failure to pay the fee imposed by this section within ninety (90) days after
receipt of the notice shall result in the suspension of the operator's license
or driving privileges of the offender, and, in addition to any existing fees,
fines, and penalties, the cabinet shall assess a fee of fifty dollars ($50) to the
offender. In addition to the reinstatement fee outlined in KRS 186.531, the
fee assessed under this paragraph shall be payable upon the application for
reinstatement of the offender's operator's license or driving privileges.
(c) The cabinet shall provide notice under this section to the offender by first-
class mail to the address of record of the offender. Such mailed notice shall
be adequate notification of the fee imposed by this section and the
offender's ability to avoid suspension of driving privileges by paying the fee
prior to the effective date of suspension. No other notice shall be required to
make a suspension of driving privileges effective.
(3) Fees collected under this section shall be allocated as follows:
(a) Forty percent (40%) shall be transferred into the Kentucky trauma care
system fund established in Section 6 of this Act;
(b) Twenty percent (20%) shall be transferred into the Bentley rural hospital
preservation fund established in Section 7 of this Act;
(c) Twenty percent (20%) shall be transferred into the emergency medical
services education grant fund established in Section 3 of this Act. If the
Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services ceases all components of
the emergency medical services education grant program established in
Section 3 of this Act, the fees identified in this paragraph shall be
Page 6 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
transferred into the Bentley rural hospital preservation fund established in
Section 7 of this Act; and
(d) Twenty percent (20%) shall be transferred into the School AED fund
established in Section 8 of this Act.
(4) If the Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services ceases all components of
the emergency medical services education grant program established under
Section 3 of this Act, the remaining fund amounts shall be transferred into the
Bentley rural hospital preservation fund established in Section 7 of this Act.
(5) Once every five (5) years, the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue Budget Review Subcommittee on Health and Family Services shall
review the allocation percentages set forth in subsection (3) of this section to
assess the current needs of the various funds receiving allocations.
(6) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An emergency medical services education grant program is established to
increase the numbers of persons seeking paramedic initial certification, provide
more facilities for certification, and encourage those persons to be employed by
Class I ground ambulance providers located in Kentucky. The program shall
consist of three (3) components as follows:
(a) Student tuition support;
(b) Agency support; and
(c) Emergency medical services training or educational institution support.
(2) The student tuition support component shall be used for the training and
education of individuals seeking initial paramedic certification under this chapter
who are employed by a Class I ground ambulance provider. The tuition support
Page 7 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
shall be paid periodically to the emergency medical services training or
educational institution in which the person is enrolled seeking paramedic
certification. The board shall, at a minimum, promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A on the following aspects of this
component:
(a) Time limits for the individual seeking initial paramedic certification to
complete certification and begin or continue service with a Class I ground
ambulance provider;
(b) Minimum service length requirements that may be imposed by the board, by
contract, or both, on the individual seeking initial paramedic certification;
(c) Uses of the funds, including but not limited to a prohibition on spending
funds on prerequisite courses not included in the core course content of the
paramedic certification program;
(d) Providing priority consideration for geographic areas that are underserved
in terms of paramedic coverage, including those with lower populations and
higher emergency medical response times, and providing priority
consideration for agencies that do not meet national standards of minimum
staffing levels or response times for the dispatch of emergency medical care;
and
(e) Any other aspect of the component that will implement the provisions of this
section.
(3) The agency support component shall be used to reimburse Class I ground
ambulance providers the wages paid to an employee while the employee seeks
initial paramedic certification. The board shall, at a minimum, promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A on the following
aspects of this component:
(a) Maximum reimbursement for each employee of the Class I ground
Page 8 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
ambulance provider seeking initial paramedic certification;
(b) Maximum number of employees eligible for wage reimbursement within
each Class I ground ambulance provider; and
(c) Any other aspect of the component that will implement the provisions of this
section.
(4) The emergency medical services training or educational institution support
component shall be used to provide funding to existing and start up emergency
medical services training or educational institutions that are certified or seeking
certification by the board and that offer or will offer initial education courses for
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician, and
paramedic programs. The board shall, at a minimum, promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A on the following aspects of this
component:
(a) Grant ceilings per applicant;
(b) Applicant qualification priorities, including but not limited to those that are
nonprofit entities operating under KRS Chapter 273 and those that are
serving, or plan to serve, areas in need of improved emergency medical
service coverage;
(c) Time limits for commencing the classes or programs for which the grant
was sought; and
(d) 1. Eligible costs, which shall include but not be limited to:
a. Computer and computer-related equipment and software;
b. Medical and training equipment, such as cardiac monitors,
defibrillators, mannequins, and other medical equipment,
personal protective gear, and durable emergency medical and
trauma education simulation equipment;
c. Personnel costs used in directly delivering the education
Page 9 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
program; and
d. Services used in operating the program; and
2. Ineligible costs, which shall include but not be limited to:
a. Real property purchases or improvements;
b. Building construction, renovation, or maintenance;
c. Personnel costs not directly related to delivering the education
program such as costs related to educator training, including
travel and meals, and perquisites that are part of a compensation
package;
d. Lobbying; and
e. Uniforms and clothing.
(5) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency
account to be known as the emergency medical services education grant
fund. The fund shall consist of state appropriations, contributions,
donations, gifts, moneys allocated under Section 2 of this Act, and
repayments.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Board of Emergency
Medical Services.
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the purposes set forth in
this section and for no other purpose.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal
year.
(6) The board shall administer the emergency medical services education grant
program. The board may cease any or all components of the program once the
desired goals have been achieved in the judgment of the board. The board shall
provide staffing for the program and may use moneys in the emergency medical
Page 10 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
services education grant fund to do so. Staffing and administrative costs shall not
exceed five percent (5%) of the fund amount. The board may promulgate any
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, in addition to
those listed in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, that are necessary for the
implementation and operation of the program.
Section 4. KRS 189.394 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The fines for speeding in violation of KRS 189.390 shall be:
Mph. Prima Facie or Maximum Speed
Over
Limit 15 20 25 30 35 40 45 50 55 60 65 70
Fine
1 16 21 26 31 36 41 46 51 56 61 66 71 $1
2 17 22 27 32 37 42 47 52 57 62 67 72 2
3 18 23 28 33 38 43 48 53 58 63 68 73 3
4 19 24 29 34 39 44 49 54 59 64 69 74 4
5 20 25 30 35 40 45 50 55 60 65 70 75 5
6 21 26 31 36 41 46 51 56 61 66 71 76 16
7 22 27 32 37 42 47 52 57 62 67 72 77 17
8 23 28 33 38 43 48 53 58 63 68 73 78 18
9 24 29 34 39 44 49 54 59 64 69 74 79 19
10 25 30 35 40 45 50 55 60 65 70 75 80 20
11 26 31 36 41 46 51 56 61 66 71 76 81 22
12 27 32 37 42 47 52 57 62 67 72 77 82 24
13 28 33 38 43 48 53 58 63 68 73 78 83 26
14 29 34 39 44 49 54 59 64 69 74 79 84 28
15 30 35 40 45 50 55 60 65 70 75 80 85 30
16 31 36 41 46 51 56 61 66 71 76 81 32
17 32 37 42 47 52 57 62 67 72 77 82 34
18 33 38 43 48 53 58 63 68 73 78 83 36
19 34 39 44 49 54 59 64 69 74 79 84 38
20 35 40 45 50 55 60 65 70 75 80 85 40
21 36 41 46 51 56 61 66 71 43
22 37 42 47 52 57 62 67 72 46
23 38 43 48 53 58 63 68 73 49
24 39 44 49 54 59 64 69 74 52
25 40 45 50 55 60 65 70 75 55
(2) For speeding in excess of the speeds shown on the specific fine schedule, the fine
Page 11 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
shall be not less than sixty dollars ($60) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(3) For any violation shown on the chart for which a specific fine is prescribed, the
defendant may elect to pay the fine and court costs to the circuit clerk before the
date of his or her trial or to be tried in the normal manner. Payment of the fine and
court costs to the clerk shall be considered as a plea of guilty for all purposes.
(4) If the offense charged shows a speed in excess of the speeds shown on the specific
fine schedule, the defendant shall appear for trial and may not pay the fine to the
clerk before the trial date.
(5) If the offense occurred in an area near a school where flasher lights have been
installed and are flashing, and a speed limit has been set pursuant to KRS 189.336,
the fine established by subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be doubled.
(6) In addition to the fines set forth in this section, any person convicted as a super
speeder shall also be subject to the imposition of fees and suspension of his or her
operator's license or driving privileges pursuant to Section 2 of this Act.
Section 5. KRS 186.440 is amended to read as follows:
An operator's license shall not be granted to:
(1) Any person who is not a resident of Kentucky;
(2) Any person under the age of sixteen (16);
(3) Any person under the age of eighteen (18) who holds a valid Kentucky instruction
permit issued pursuant to KRS 186.450, but who has not graduated from high
school or who is not enrolled and successfully participating in school or who is not
being schooled at home, except those persons who satisfy the District Court of
appropriate venue pursuant to KRS 159.051(3) that revocation of their license
would create an undue hardship. Persons under the age of eighteen (18) shall
present proof of complying with the requirements of KRS 159.051;
(4) Any person whose operator's license has been suspended, during the period of
suspension, subject to the limitations of KRS 186.442;
Page 12 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
(5) Any person whose operator's license has been revoked, nor to any nonresident
whose privilege of exemption under KRS 186.430 has been refused or
discontinued, until the expiration of the period for which the license was revoked,
or for which the privilege was refused or discontinued;
(6) Any applicant adjudged incompetent by judicial decree;
(7) Any person who in the opinion of the Department of Kentucky State Police, after
examination, is unable to exercise reasonable and ordinary control over a motor
vehicle upon the highways;
(8) Any person who is unable to understand highway warnings or direction signs in the
English language;
(9) Any person required by KRS 186.480 to take an examination who has not
successfully passed the examination;
(10) Any person required by KRS Chapter 187 to deposit proof of financial
responsibility, who has not deposited that proof;
(11) Any person who has not filed a correct and complete application attested to in the
presence of a person authorized to administer oaths;
(12) Any person who cannot meet the requirements set forth in KRS 186.411(1) or (3);
[or]
(13) Any person whose operator's license has been suspended or revoked under the
provisions of KRS Chapter 186, 187, or 189A who has not paid the reinstatement
fee required under KRS 186.531; or
(14) Any super speeder, as defined in Section 1 of this Act:
(a) Whose operator's license or driving privilege has been suspended pursuant
to Section 2 of this Act; and
(b) Who has not satisfied the payment of any fees assessed under Section 2 of
this Act and the reinstatement fee under KRS 186.531.
Section 6. KRS 211.496 is amended to read as follows:
Page 13 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
(1) The Kentucky trauma care system fund is created as a restricted account that shall
consist of state general fund appropriations and other grants, contributions,
donations, moneys allocated under Section 2 of this Act, or other moneys made
available for the purposes of KRS 211.490 to 211.496[. Moneys in the fund are
hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in KRS 211.490 to 211.496].
(2) Amounts deposited into the trauma care system fund shall be used in the following
order of prioritization[used to support]:
(a) [Administrative costs of the Department for Public Health, the statewide
trauma care director, and the advisory committee that relate to the statewide
trauma care system, including public awareness and information efforts;
(b) ]The implementation of the statewide trauma care system, including trauma
registries and data banks at the state and designated trauma hospital levels;
(b)[(c)] Expenses related to hospital trauma center verification;
(c) Administrative costs of the Department for Public Health, the statewide
trauma care director, and the advisory committee that relates to the
statewide trauma care system, including funding for trauma coordinators,
education, scholarships, public awareness, and information efforts;
(d) Continuing education and support for trauma care providers, including
Kentucky licensed emergency ambulance services assisting with a response
and interfacility transfers;[ and]
(e) Support for uncompensated care provided by hospitals, physicians, emergency
medical services, or other trauma care providers who provide services in a
verified trauma center to uninsured trauma patients, including transport and
transfer costs not covered by other payers. Verified trauma centers shall have
the authority to contract with state government for receipt of funds under this
paragraph; and
(f) Payments to designated trauma hospitals to specifically assist with physician
Page 14 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
employment costs.
(3) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of a
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the[ succeeding] next
fiscal year[ to be used for the purposes set forth in KRS 211.490 to 211.496.
(4) Any interest earned on moneys in the account shall accrue to the fund and shall be
used for the purposes set forth in KRS 211.490 to 211.496].
Section 7. KRS 154.20-190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Authority" means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority;
(b) "Qualifying former hospital" means a hospital facility:
1. At a location that closed within thirty-six (36) months prior to an
application for a loan; and
2. For which the former owner or new owner has obtained a certificate of
need to open a new hospital or other health facility as defined in KRS
216B.015 that provides inpatient care at the closed location; and
(c) "Rural hospital" means any hospital or qualifying former hospital located
within a county of the Commonwealth having a population of less than fifty
thousand (50,000) according to the most recent annual estimates of the
resident population issued by the United States Census Bureau.
(2) (a) The Bentley rural hospital preservation[operations and facilities revolving
loan] fund is established. The authority shall provide loans to a rural hospital
not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the fund's balance at the beginning of a
fiscal year for any project within a rural hospital[one million dollars
($1,000,000) for any project within a rural hospital and shall not exceed more
than two million dollars ($2,000,000) every five (5) years].
(b) In using moneys allocated to the fund under Section 2 of this Act, the
authority shall give priority to providing loans to hospitals to provide
Page 15 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
services in counties that do not currently have a rural hospital.
(c) Any loan issued by the authority shall not exceed a twenty (20) year term and
shall be utilized by the Cabinet for Economic Development to assist a rural
hospital in providing needed direct health care services for the citizens of the
Commonwealth by:
1. Maintaining or upgrading the hospital's facilities;
2. Maintaining or increasing the current staff of the rural hospital;
3. Reopening a qualifying former hospital;[ or]
4. Providing health care services that are not currently available to citizens;
or
5. Converting a rural hospital to rural emergency hospital status.
(d)[(c)] The authority shall consider a group with multiple locations eligible
under this section as if each separate location is a separate entity for purposes
of determining eligibility and applicable loan limits.
(3) The Cabinet for Economic Development shall:
(a) Determine the terms and conditions of each loan, including the repayment to
be deposited back in the revolving loan fund for issuance of future loans to
other rural hospitals;
(b) Monitor the performance of the rural hospital; and
(c) By November 1 of each year[, 2023, and by each November 1 thereafter],
report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue
information about each outstanding loan issued, including:
1. The name and location of the rural hospital;
2. The amount of principal originally loaned;
3. The terms of the loan and whether the rural hospital is currently meeting
those terms; and
4. How the rural hospital used the loan related to facilities, staff, or
Page 16 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
additional services.
(4) (a) The fund created in subsection (2) of this section shall be a trust and agency
account.
(b) The Cabinet for Economic Development shall administer the fund.
(c) The fund shall consist of appropriations, contributions, donations, gifts,[ or]
federal funds, and moneys transferred to the fund under Section 2 of this
Act.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended[any moneys
remaining in the fund] at the close of a[the] fiscal year shall not lapse but
shall be carried forward into the next[succeeding] fiscal year.
[(e) Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not
lapse.
(f) Moneys deposited in the fund are hereby appropriated for the sole purpose of
providing loans to rural hospitals.]
Section 8. KRS 158.1622 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury[created] a trust and agency
account to be known as the school AED fund to be administered by the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services, in collaboration with the Department of Education.
Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used for the purpose of awarding needs-
based grants to public schools for:
(a) The purchase and maintenance of portable automated external defibrillators
and other medical devices used to diagnose, prevent, or treat a medical
condition that is harmful to student athletes; and
(b) The provision of cardiopulmonary resuscitation training.
(2) The school AED fund shall consist of any:
(a) Appropriations designated for the fund;
(b) Funds, grants, and receipts from fundraising activities on behalf of the fund;
Page 17 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 998
[and]
(c) Moneys allocated under Section 2 of this Act; and
(d) Other moneys made available for the purposes of the fund.
(3) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(4)[ Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not
lapse.
(5) Moneys deposited in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in
this section and shall not be appropriated or transferred by the General Assembly
for any other purposes.
(6)] Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to restrict the ability of a school or
school district to accept direct private donations for the purchase or maintenance of
an automated external defibrillator or other medical device used to diagnose,
prevent, or treat a medical condition that is harmful to student athletes.
Page 18 of 18
XXXX 1/8/2025 1:33 PM Jacketed